Idaho, session 2025, S1186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND FINDINGS. It is the intent of the Leg-
islature to identify and discourage quid pro quo corruption in fact as well
as diminish the appearance of quid pro quo corruption. The Legislature finds
that when a person or entity spends large sums of money either in support
of or opposition to a candidate and the identity of such person or entity is
opaque to the public, it is impossible for the public to know who is funding
such campaigns and to what degree those campaigns are funded by dark money
that is not tied to any named individual or business. The Legislature finds
that this knowledge is important to the public because in many cases the in-
dividuals funding such campaigns appear to do so with the specific purpose
of surreptitiously electing an official they believe they can control, ca-
jole, or threaten into voting in a manner that they wish, which leads to at
least an appearance of a quid pro quo relationship between the person elected
and those secretly funding the entities paying for electioneering campaigns
with dark money.
The Legislature further finds that a common belief among the populace
is that many elected officials are overly influenced, if not controlled, by
well-funded special interests. In order to dispel the appearance of quid pro
quo corruption when it may not exist and to better root it out where it does
exist, this legislation will allow members of the public, regulators, and
law enforcement officials to more clearly identify who is making the contri-
butions that have had such a large impact on election outcomes in Idaho in-
stead of continuing to allow wealthy players to hide behind a curtain of dark
money.
The Legislature further finds that innocent individuals and entities
are also often accused of financing dark money expenditures when they are


not. This leaves these individuals and organizations who are not partici-
pating in dark money expenditures in a position of being asked to prove a neg-
ative, which can be impossible due to the lack of transparency in campaign
finance reporting, and which contributes to the majority of the public be-
lieving corrupt practices are being employed and hidden.
The Legislature further finds that the appearance of such negative and
damaging relationships could be dispelled if members of the public are able
to know who all of the players are by disclosing all of the large contribu-
tors, which can, in turn, dispel the appearance of quid pro quo corruption
for many who are assumed to be, or are incorrectly accused of, participat-
ing in suspected quid pro quo relationships. If this legislation is enacted,
it can be clearly shown which individuals and entities are not contributing
significant amounts to the various entities engaging in electioneering cam-
paigns.
The Legislature further finds that unlike the federal judiciary,
Idaho's Supreme Court justices, appellate judges, and district court judges
are elected, and are therefore more susceptible to the appearance of quid pro
quo corruption than members of the federal judiciary as long as dark money
contributions are allowed in Idaho elections. In addition to other consid-
erations, this demonstrates a greater need for disclosure in Idaho than in
federal elections because the Idaho judiciary presides over quid pro quo
corruption cases when they occur in Idaho. However, as elected officials
themselves, members of the Idaho judiciary are just as susceptible to the
appearance of quid pro quo corruption by the public as any other elected of-
ficial. Reducing or eliminating the practice of dark money expenditures in
Idaho elections will help to dispel the public's perception of quid pro quo
corruption related to all elected officials, including elected members of
the judiciary who arguably have the greatest need for trust from the public,
as they are the final arbiters of alleged corruption by officials elected in
Idaho.
It is therefore the intent of the Legislature, in order to dispel the ap-
pearance of quid pro quo corruption when it may not exist, and to better root
it out where it does exist, to allow the public to see who has previously been
hiding behind the proverbial curtain of dark money contributions that have
such a large impact on elections and potentially the votes of those who are
elected.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6602. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) "Business" means a partnership, corporation, business entity, as-
sociation, firm, or any group of two (2) or more individuals for which a ma-
jority of its revenue is derived from the sale of goods or services.
(1) (2) "Candidate" means an individual who seeks nomination, elec-
tion, or reelection to public office and who has taken any of the following
actions:
(a) Announced the individual's candidacy publicly;
(b) Filed for public office;


(c) Received a contribution for the purpose of promoting the individ-
ual's candidacy for office; or
(d) Made an expenditure, contracted for services, or reserved space
with the intent of promoting the individual's candidacy for office.
For purposes of this chapter, an incumbent shall be presumed to be a can-
didate in the subsequent election for his or her office until the in-
cumbent has failed to file a declaration of candidacy by the statutory
deadline.
(2) (3) "Compensation" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness
of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge or
transfer of money or anything of value, and any contract, agreement, promise
or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, to do any of the
foregoing, for services rendered or to be rendered, but does not include
reimbursement of expenses if such reimbursement does not exceed the amount
actually expended for such expenses and is substantiated by an itemization
of such expenses.
(3) (4) "Contractor" means a person who receives compensation from an-
other person for either full-time or part-time work based on a contract or
compensation agreement, but who is not an employee of that person.
(4) (5) "Contribution" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness
of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, sub-
scription or transfer of money or anything of value, and any contract, agree-
ment, promise or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, to
make a contribution, in support of or in opposition to any candidate, polit-
ical committee or measure. Such term also includes personal funds or other
property of a candidate or members of his household expended or transferred
to cover expenditures incurred in support of such candidate but does not in-
clude personal funds used to pay the candidate filing fee. Such term also
includes the rendering of personal and professional services for less than
full consideration, but does not include ordinary home hospitality or the
rendering of "part-time" personal services of the sort commonly performed
by volunteer campaign workers or advisors or incidental expenses not in ex-
cess of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) personally paid for by any volunteer
campaign worker. "Part-time" services, for the purposes of this definition,
means services in addition to regular full-time employment, or, in the case
of an unemployed person or persons engaged in part-time employment, services
rendered without compensation or reimbursement of expenses from any source
other than the candidate or political committee for whom such services are
rendered. For the purposes of this act, contributions, other than money or
its equivalent shall be deemed to have a money value equivalent to the fair
market value of the contribution.
(5) (6) "Election" means any state or local general, special, recall,
or primary election.
(6) (7) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in oppo-
sition to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in sup-
port of, or in opposition to, a measure.
(7) (8)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any communication
broadcast by television or radio, printed in a newspaper or on a bill-
board, directly mailed or delivered by hand to personal residences, or


telephone calls made to personal residences, or otherwise distributed
that:
(i) Unambiguously refers to any candidate; and
(ii) Is broadcasted, printed, mailed, delivered, made or dis-
tributed within thirty (30) days before a primary election or
sixty (60) days before a general election; and
(iii) Is broadcasted to, printed in a newspaper, distributed to,
mailed to or delivered by hand to, telephone calls made to, or
otherwise distributed to an audience that includes members of the
electorate for such public office.
(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(i) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion or com-
mentary, writings, or letter to the editor printed in a newspaper,
magazine, or other periodical not owned or controlled by a candi-
date, political committee, or political party;
(ii) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast
facility not owned or controlled by a candidate, political commit-
tee, or political party;
(iii) Any communication by persons made in the regular course and
scope of their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such organization and their fam-
ilies;
(iv) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part
of the popular name of a bill or statute;
(v) A communication that constitutes an expenditure or an inde-
pendent expenditure under this chapter.
(8) (9) "Employee" means an individual who performs a service for wages
or other compensation from which the individual's employer withholds fed-
eral employment taxes under a contract for hire, written or oral.
(9) (10) "Executive official" means:
(a) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state con-
troller, state treasurer, attorney general, superintendent of public
instruction and any deputy or staff member of any of those individuals
who, within the course and scope of his or her employment, is directly
involved in major policy-influencing decisions for the office;
(b) A state department or agency director, deputy director, division
administrator or bureau chief as established and enumerated in sections
67-2402 and 67-2406, Idaho Code;
(c) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that is authorized to make rules or conduct
rulemaking activities pursuant to section 67-5201, Idaho Code;
(d) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that governs any of the state departments
enumerated in section 67-2402, Idaho Code, not including public school
districts;
(e) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of the Idaho public utilities commission, the Idaho industrial commis-
sion, and the Idaho state tax commission; and
(f) The members of the governing board of the state insurance fund and
the members of the governing board and the executive or chief adminis-


trative officer of the Idaho housing and finance association, the Idaho
energy resources authority, and the Idaho state building authority.
(10) (11) "Expenditure" includes any payment, contribution, subscrip-
tion, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything
of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities or anything of value
for the purpose of assisting, benefiting or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign.
(11) (12) "Independent expenditure" means any expenditure by a person
for a communication expressly advocating the election, passage or defeat of
a clearly identified candidate or measure that is not made with the coopera-
tion or with the prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the consent
of, or in consultation with, or at the request of a suggestion of, a candidate
or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate or political committee
supporting or opposing a measure. As used in this subsection, "expressly ad-
vocating" means any communication containing a message advocating election,
passage or defeat including, but not limited to, the name of the candidate
or measure, or expression such as "vote for," "elect," "support," "cast your
ballot for," "vote against," "defeat" or "reject."
(12) (13) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each means attempting through contacts
with, or causing others to make contact with, members of the legislature or
legislative committees or an executive official to influence the approval,
modification or rejection of any legislation by the legislature of the state
of Idaho or any committee thereof or by the governor or to develop or main-
tain relationships with, promote goodwill with, or entertain members of the
legislature or executive officials. "Lobby" and "lobbying" shall also mean
communicating with an executive official for the purpose of influencing the
consideration, amendment, adoption or rejection of any rule or rulemaking as
defined in section 67-5201, Idaho Code, or any ratemaking decision, procure-
ment, contract, bid or bid process, financial services agreement, or bond
issue. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that association
or organization; and provided that neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes
communicating with an executive official for the purpose of carrying out
ongoing negotiations following the award of a bid or a contract, communica-
tions involving ongoing legal work and negotiations conducted by and with
attorneys for executive agencies, interactions between parties in litiga-
tion or other contested matters, or communications among and between members
of the legislature and executive officials and their employees, or by state
employees while acting in their official capacity or within the course and
scope of their employment.
(13) (14) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies.
(14) (15) "Lobbyist's client" means the person on whose behalf the lob-
byist is acting, directly or indirectly, as a contractor, and by whom the
lobbyist or lobbyist's employer is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(15) (16) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons for whom a
lobbyist is an employee, and by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting
as a lobbyist.


(16) (17) "Local government office" means any publicly elected office
for any political subdivision of the state or special district that is not a
legislative, judicial, statewide, or federal office.
(17) (18) "Measure" means any proposal submitted to the people for their
approval or rejection at an election, including any initiative, referendum,
recall election, or revision of or amendment to the state constitution. An
initiative or referendum proposal shall be deemed a measure when the attor-
ney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney, as appropriate, reviews it
and gives it a ballot title. A recall shall be deemed a measure upon approval
of the recall petition as to form pursuant to section 34-1704, Idaho Code.
(18) (19) "Nonbusiness entity" means any group of two (2) or more indi-
viduals, a corporation, association, firm, partnership, committee, club or
other organization that:
(a) Does not have as its principal purpose the conduct of business ac-
tivities for profit; and
(b) Received during the preceding or current calendar year contribu-
tions, gifts or membership fees, which in the aggregate exceeded ten
percent (10%) of its total receipts for such year.
(19) (20) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association,
firm, partnership, committee, political party, club or other organization
or group of persons.
(20) (21) "Political committee" means:
(a) Any person specifically designated to support or oppose any candi-
date or measure; or
(b) Any person who receives contributions and makes expenditures in an
amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or mea-
sures.
(c) A county, district or regional committee of a recognized politi-
cal party shall not be considered a political committee for the purposes
of this chapter unless such party committee has expenditures exceeding
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in a calendar year.
(21) (22) "Political treasurer" means an individual appointed by a can-
didate or political committee as provided in section 67-6603, Idaho Code.
(22) (23) "Public office" means any local, legislative, judicial, or
state office or position that is filled by election but does not include the
office of precinct committeeman.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-6606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6606. EXPENDITURES BY NONBUSINESS ENTITY. (1) Any nonbusiness en-
tity that is not a political committee as defined in section 67-6602, Idaho
Code, making expenditures in or directed to voters in the state of Idaho in
an amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or measures
shall file a statement with the secretary of state. The statement shall in-
clude:
(a) The name and address of the nonbusiness entity and the name and ad-
dress of its principal officer or directors.;


(b) The name and address of each person whose fees, dues, payments
or other consideration paid to such nonbusiness entity during either
of the prior two (2) calendar years has exceeded five hundred dollars
($500) or who has paid or has agreed to pay fees, dues, payments or other
consideration exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) to such entity dur-
ing the current year.; and
(c) In the case of a nonbusiness entity making expenditures in support
of or in opposition to a candidate, the full name and complete address
of each person who has contributed to the reporting nonbusiness entity
an aggregate amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more during
the previous twelve (12) months. If the person making the contribu-
tion to the nonbusiness entity is not an individual or business, the
report shall also include a list with the full name and complete ad-
dress of each person who in turn has donated an aggregate amount of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to such person donating to the non-
business entity who is not an individual or business within the previous
twelve (12) months. The disclosure of donors shall continue tracing
back through each donor who is not an individual or business, until
the aggregate contributions from a person equal less then one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or all donors have been identified as individuals or
businesses, in accordance with the transparency provisions of section
67-6614, Idaho Code. In order to provide the proper reports required
pursuant to this paragraph, any nonbusiness entity required to report
under this subsection shall request the name, address, and donation
amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more from any person who is
not an individual or business and who contributes an aggregate amount
of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to such nonbusiness entity.
Such contributions shall not be expended until all such donations of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or more have been traced back to an individual
or business.
(2) This statement shall be filed within thirty (30) days of when the
one thousand dollar ($1,000) threshold mentioned in subsection (1) of this
section is exceeded.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-6607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6607. REPORTS OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES BY CANDIDATES AND
POLITICAL COMMITTEES. (1) Each candidate or the political treasurer for each
candidate, and each political committee or the political treasurer of each
political committee, shall file with the secretary of state a statement of
all contributions received and all expenditures and encumbrances made by or
on behalf of the candidate or political committee, according to the schedule
provided in this section. The statement shall itemize each contribution re-
ceived and each expenditure or encumbrance made during the reporting period
and shall include the following:
(a) Under contributions, the statement shall include a list of all the
contributions received, including any funds or property of the candi-
date used to cover expenditures. The statement shall list the full name
and complete address of each person who contributed an aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the amount contributed by that


person. The statement may list as a single item the total amount of con-
tributions of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less; and
(b) Under expenditures, the statement shall include the name and ad-
dress of each person to whom an expenditure or encumbrance was made in
the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more, and the amount,
date, and purpose of each such expenditure. Each expenditure or encum-
brance in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more shall be
evidenced by an invoice, receipt, or canceled check or an accurate copy
thereof. Such evidence shall not be filed with the statement but shall
be retained by the committee or candidate for a period of one (1) year
after the statement has been filed. The statement may list as a single
item the total amount of expenditures and encumbrances of less than
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) without showing the exact amount of or re-
quiring evidence of each such expenditure or encumbrance. Anything of
value, other than money, paid for or contributed by any person shall be
listed both as an expenditure and as a contribution.
(2) For the first report under this section, the reporting period shall
cover the period beginning with the first contribution, expenditure, or en-
cumbrance through the end of the current reporting period. Each candidate
and each political committee, or the treasurer for a candidate or political
committee or ballot measure, shall file the report described under subsec-
tion (1) of this section as follows:
(a) In the year of the election, a monthly report shall be filed for each
month of the year. Each report shall be filed by the tenth day of the
month following the month being reported; and
(b) For the nonelection year, an annual report covering the nonelection
year shall be filed by January 10 of the following year.
(3) Notwithstanding any other reports required under this section,
each candidate and each political committee, or the political treasurer for
each candidate and each political committee, shall notify the secretary of
state of any contribution of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. This
notification shall be made within forty-eight (48) hours after the receipt
of such contribution and shall include the name of the candidate, political
committee or measure, the identification of the contributor, and the date of
receipt and amount of the contribution. The notification shall be in addi-
tion to the reporting of these contributions in the regular reports.
(4)(a) In the case of a political committee receiving contributions
in support of or in opposition to a candidate from a person who is not
an individual or business and has donated aggregate contributions of
one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more during the previous twelve (12)
months to the reporting political committee, the political committee
shall also provide a list of the full names and complete addresses of
each person who in turn has made an aggregate contribution of one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000) or more to such donor who is not an individual or
business within the previous twelve (12) months. Such donor disclosure
shall continue tracing back through each donor who is not an individual
or business until either a donor's total contributions equal less than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) or all donors have been identified as in-
dividuals or businesses in accordance with the transparency provisions
of section 67-6614, Idaho Code.


(b) In order to provide the proper reports required pursuant to para-
graph (a) of this subsection, any political committee receiving aggre-
gate contributions of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in support
of or in opposition to a candidate from a person who is not an indi-
vidual or business shall request a list from such person of the names,
addresses, and donated amounts of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more
that were made to such donor during the previous twelve (12) months.
Such contributions shall not be expended until all such donations of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or more have been traced back to an individual
or business.
(c) The secretary of state shall prescribe forms for the reporting of
the disclosures required pursuant to this subsection.
(4) (5) All reports required pursuant to this section shall be filed
online with the secretary of state, unless a waiver has been provided under
section 67-6623, Idaho Code, by no later than midnight on the date the filing
is due.
(5) (6) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this sec-
tion shall be filed until the account no longer shows any unexpended balance
of contributions or expenditure deficit.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-6610, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6610. CONTRIBUTION IN EXCESS OF FIFTY DOLLARS. (a) (1) Any person
who contributes more than an aggregate amount of fifty dollars ($50.00)
(including one or more smaller contributions which aggregate more than fifty
dollars ($50.00) in any one calendar year) or more during the previous twelve
(12) months to a candidate or political committee shall accompany the con-
tribution with a statement of his full name and complete address.
(b) (2) If a political treasurer is offered or receives a payment or
contribution of more than in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00), or which to-
gether with prior contributions from the same person during that calendar
year exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00), during the previous twelve (12) months
and there is no statement of the full name and complete address of the person
making the contribution, the contribution shall be returned to the contribu-
tor if his identity can be ascertained. If the contributor's identity cannot
be ascertained, the contribution shall be transmitted immediately by the po-
litical treasurer who received it to the state controller for deposit in the
public school permanent endowment fund.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-6611, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6611. INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES. (1) Each person, other than a can-
didate in an Idaho election, who makes independent expenditures in an aggre-
gate amount exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) in support of or in opposi-
tion to any one (1) candidate, political committee, or measure shall file a
statement of the expenditure with the secretary of state.
(2) Statements shall be filed with the secretary of state, not less than
seven (7) days prior to the primary and general election and thirty (30) days
after the primary and general election.


(3) The statement shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and address of any person to whom an expenditure in excess
of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made by any such person in support of
or in opposition to any such candidate or measure during the reporting
period, together with the amount, date, and purpose of each such expen-
diture, including the identity of the candidate or measure, and whether
the expenditure was made either in support of or in opposition to such
candidate or measure; and
(b) The total sum of all expenditures made in support of or in opposi-
tion to any such candidate or measure.
(4) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section, each person, other than a candidate in an Idaho elec-
tion, who makes independent expenditures in an aggregate amount of one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000) or more after the sixteenth day before, but more than
forty-eight (48) hours before, any primary or general election shall file
a written statement of the expenditure with the secretary of state not more
than forty-eight (48) hours from the time of such expenditure. The statement
shall include the information required in subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) Each person, other than a candidate in an Idaho election, making
independent expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate
shall report the name and address of each person who has donated contri-
butions to the reporting person in the aggregate amount of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more during the previous twelve (12) months. If the
person donating contributions to the person making such independent
expenditures is not an individual or business, the person making inde-
pendent expenditures shall provide a list of the full name and complete
address of each person who in turn has donated one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more within the previous twelve (12) months to the person
donating to the person making such independent expenditures. Such
donor disclosure shall continue tracing back through each donor who is
not an individual or business until either a donor's total contribu-
tions equal less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or all donors have
been identified as individuals or businesses in accordance with the
transparency provisions of section 67-6614, Idaho Code.
(b) In order to provide the proper reports required pursuant to para-
graph (a) of this subsection, any person, other than a candidate in an
Idaho election, making independent expenditures or donating money to
another person for the purpose of making independent expenditures in
support of or in opposition to a candidate who receives aggregate con-
tributions of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more from a person who
is not an individual or business shall request from such person a list
of the names, addresses, and donated amounts of one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more that were made to such donor during the previous twelve
(12) months. No independent expenditure shall be made until all such
donations of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more have traced back to
an individual or business.
SECTION 7. That Section 67-6612, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


67-6612. DISCLOSURE OF PAYMENTS MADE TO SIGNATURE GATHERERS. (1) Any
person who pays or provides other valuable consideration in an aggregate
amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more to another person or persons,
in exchange for their actions or intended actions of gathering signatures
on a ballot initiative petition or referendum, shall file a statement of the
expenditure with the secretary of state.
(2) The provisions of this section shall apply beginning on the date
that the ballot initiative or referendum petitioners receive from the secre-
tary of state the official ballot title for which the person is paying to have
signatures gathered and shall continue for as long as the filer makes pay-
ments to a signature gatherer or gatherers.
(3) Statements shall be filed on or before the twentieth day of the
month following the month during which the payments to the signature gath-
erers were made.
(4) The statement shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and address of any signature gatherer to whom a payment
in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made during the reported
month; and
(b) The total sum of all payments made to signature gatherers in the ag-
gregate during the reported month.
(5) In addition to the statements filed under subsection (3) of this
section, any person who pays a signature gatherer or gatherers the aggregate
amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more during the fourteen (14) days
prior to the election shall file a notice of the expenditures with the secre-
tary of state not more than forty-eight (48) hours from the time of the expen-
diture. The notice shall include the information required under subsection
(4) of this section.
(6)(a) A person required to report pursuant to this section shall also
report the name and address of each person who has donated contributions
in an aggregate amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more during
the previous twelve (12) months to the reporting person in support of
a ballot measure. If the person donating such contribution is not an
individual or business, the person required to report pursuant to this
section shall provide a list of the names, addresses, and contribution
amounts from each person who has in turn made aggregate contributions of
one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to the person donating to the per-
son reporting pursuant to this section within the previous twelve (12)
months. The donor disclosure shall continue tracing back through each
donor who is not an individual or business until the aggregate dona-
tions from a person equal less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or all
donors have been identified as individuals or businesses in accordance
with the transparency provisions of section 67-6614, Idaho Code.
(b) In order to provide the proper reports required pursuant to para-
graph (a) of this subsection, any person required to report pursuant to
this section for paying signature gatherers shall, upon the receipt of
aggregate contributions of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more from a
person who is not an individual or business, request from such person a
list of the names, addresses, and donated amounts of one thousand dol-
lars ($1,000) or more that were made to such donor during the previous
twelve (12) months.


SECTION 8. That Section 67-6614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6614. IDENTIFICATION OF SOURCE OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDI-
TURES. No contribution shall be made and no expenditure shall be incurred,
directly or indirectly, in under a fictitious name, anonymously, or by one
(1) person through an agent, relative, nonbusiness entity, political com-
mittee, or other person in such a manner as to conceal the identity of the
source of the contribution. In the case of contributions made by a corpora-
tion, the names of the officers, directors, and equity shareholders holding
over ten percent (10%) of shares in the corporation shall also be reported in
any report required pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 9. That Section 67-6621, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6621. DUTIES OF LOBBYISTS. A person required to register as a lob-
byist under this chapter shall also have the following obligations, the vi-
olation of which shall constitute cause for revocation of his registration,
and may subject such person, and such person's employer or client, if such
employer or client aids, abets, ratifies or confirms any such act, to other
civil liabilities, as provided by this chapter:
(1) Such persons shall obtain and preserve all accounts, bills,
receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the finan-
cial reports required to be made under this chapter for a period of at least
three (3) years from the date of the filing of the statement containing such
items, which accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers and documents shall
be made available for inspection by the secretary of state at any reasonable
time during such three (3) year period; provided, however, that if a lobbyist
is required under the terms of his employment contract to turn any records
over to his employer or client, responsibility for the preservation of such
records under this subsection shall rest with such employer or client.
(2) In addition, a person required to register as a lobbyist shall not:
(a) Engage in any activity as a lobbyist before registering as such;
(b) Knowingly deceive or attempt to deceive any legislator to any fact
pertaining to any pending or proposed legislation;
(c) Cause or influence the introduction of any bill or amendment
thereto for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its de-
feat;
(d) Knowingly represent an interest adverse to any of his employers or
clients without first obtaining such employers' or clients' consent
thereto after full disclosure to such employers or clients of such ad-
verse interest;
(e) Exercise any economic reprisal, extortion, or unlawful retalia-
tion upon any legislator by reason of such legislator's position with
respect to, or his vote upon, any pending or proposed legislation; or
(f) Accept any employment as a lobbyist for a compensation dependent
in any manner upon the passage or defeat of any proposed or pending leg-
islation or upon any other contingency connected with the action of the
legislature or of either branch thereof or of any committee thereof.
This contingent fee prohibition shall also apply to lobbying activities


that pertain to communications with executive officials as described in
section 67-6602(9)(10), Idaho Code.
SECTION 10. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby de-
clared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application
of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any
reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining por-
tions of this act.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.